Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1761
Compensation; expenses.

No officer, director, or committee member, jointly or severally, shall receive any compensation, directly or indirectly, for services performed for the credit union as such officer, director, or committee member, except that the treasurer may be compensated for his or her services in the amount, way, and manner provided for by the board of directors. However, providing life, health, accident, and similar insurance protection in reasonable amounts for a director or committee member shall not be considered compensation. Officials, while on credit union business, may be reimbursed for their necessary expenses incidental to the performance of credit union business.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 61;

Laws 1999, LB 107, § 3.